South Dakota, session 2026, SB46.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 1-25:
A proposed agenda, as required by § 1-25-1.1 or 1-25-1.3, must list all items to
be considered by a public body during any official meeting.
The proposed agenda items must be described in sufficient detail to reasonably
inform the public of any official business or public policy intended to be considered at the
meeting.
A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor.

26.461.10 2 46
An Act to modify the requirements for open meeting agendas and provide a penalty therefor.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 46
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 46 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB46 ENROLLED